District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Increasing Support for Grandparent and Close Relative Caregivers
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Programs Establishment Act of 2005, effective
March 8, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-69; D.C. Official Code § 4-251.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 103(i) (D.C. Official Code § 4-251.03(i)) is amended by striking the phrase “,
for a period of not more than 60 months, any” and inserting the word “any” in its place.
(b) Section 104 (D.C. Official Code § 4-251.04) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) Pursuant to section 106, the Mayor shall establish by rule the amount of a subsidy a
grandparent or relative caregiver is eligible to receive under this act; provided, that the subsidy
shall be no less than the amount of $38.00 in Fiscal Year 2027 and adjusted for inflation
annually thereafter.”
(2) Subsection (c) is repealed.
Sec. 3. Title I of the Close Relative Caregiver Subsidy Pilot Program Establishment
Amendment Act of 2019, effective November 26, 2019 (D.C. Law 23-32; D.C. Official Code §
4-251.21 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 103(j) (D.C. Official Code § 4-251.23(j)) is amended by striking the phrase “,
for a period of no more than 60 months, any” and inserting the word “any” in its place.
(b) Section 104(c) (D.C. Official Code § 4-251.24(c)) is repealed.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2